Idaho, session 2025, S1142.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-1029, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-1030, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-1031, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-1032, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 33-1033, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 33-1031, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1031. EMPOWERING PARENTS GRANT PROGRAM. (1) There is hereby estab-
lished the empowering parents grant program, to be administered by the board
according to the provisions of this section. The purpose of the program is to
provide education grants for eligible students.
(2) In order to administer the program, the board:
(a) Shall create and administer, or designate a third party to create
and administer, a grant distribution platform;
(b) Shall establish a grant application process for parents;
(c) Shall establish provisions for the reimbursement of any eligi-
ble education expense for which reimbursement is required and di-
rect payment from the platform is not permitted pursuant to section
33-1030(3)(a), Idaho Code;


(d) Shall, subject to appropriation, award grants. Grant awards shall
be made in the following order of preference:
(i) First to eligible students whose household has an adjusted
gross income under sixty thousand dollars ($60,000), as verified
by the Idaho state tax commission using the prior year's tax re-
turns. Notification of grant awards for students in this category
shall be made within thirty (30) days of application, and grant
funds shall be made available for participants' use as soon as
practicable, but no later than thirty (30) days after the notifi-
cation of a grant award;
(ii) Starting sixty (60) days after grant awards in a fiscal year
are made under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, to eligible
students whose household has an adjusted gross income under sev-
enty-five thousand dollars ($75,000), as verified by the Idaho
state tax commission using the prior year's tax returns; and
(iii) Starting sixty (60) days after grant awards in a fiscal year
are made under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, to all other
eligible students on a first-come, first-served basis until all
available funds are distributed; and
(e) May take such other actions as are necessary to implement and en-
force the provisions of this section.
(3) Prior to the award of a grant, the parent of a participant shall
agree to verify program compliance. The parent of a participant shall use
grant funds only for eligible education expenses. If a parent is found to
misuse grant funds, then neither the parent nor another parent of the student
living in the same household may apply for a grant in the future for any stu-
dent, provided that the parent may appeal the finding to the board.
(4) Grant funds shall be expended within three (3) years after they
are awarded. Any unused funds at the end of the three (3) year period shall
revert to the empowering parents grant program fund established in section
33-1034, Idaho Code. At any time before the three (3) year period ends, un-
used funds may be forfeited and transferred from the participant account to
the program fund.
(5) Grant awards per family shall be capped at three thousand dollars
($3,000), regardless of the number of eligible students in the family.
(6) No grant awards shall be made under the provisions of this section
on or after the effective date of this act. Any grants awarded prior to the
effective date of this act may be used as provided in this section.
SECTION 7. That Section 33-1034, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1034. EMPOWERING PARENTS GRANT PROGRAM FUND. (1) There is hereby
established in the state treasury the empowering parents grant program fund,
to be administered by the board. Moneys in the fund shall:
(1) (a) Consist of the following:
(a) (i) Legislative appropriations;
(b) (ii) Donations and contributions made to the fund; and
(c) (iii) Interest earned on idle moneys in the fund;
(2) (b) Be continuously appropriated for the purpose described in sub-
section (3) of this section; and


(3) (c) Be used to pay grants awarded under the empowering parents grant
program.
(2) On June 20, 2028, and by no later than June 30, 2028, the state con-
troller shall transfer the unobligated cash balance remaining in the empow-
ering parents grant program fund into the general fund.
SECTION 8. That Section 33-1034, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 6 and 7 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 8 of
this act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2028.